Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 2.1. Virginia Home Solicitation Sales Act.

§ 59.1-21.1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Virginia Home Solicitation Sales Act.”

History.
1970, c. 668.

Law Review.

For survey of recent legislation on commerce — home solicitation sales, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 187 (1970).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

For article, “Uniform Consumer Credit Code — A Prospect for Consumer Credit Reform in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 75 (1971).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 2, 95.

§ 59.1-21.2.
Definitions.

“Home solicitation sale” means:

A consumer sale or lease of goods or services in which the seller or a person acting for him engages (i) in a personal solicitation of the sale or lease or (ii) in a solicitation of the sale or lease by telephonic or other electronic means at any residence
other than that of the seller; and

The buyer’s agreement or offer to purchase or lease is there given to the seller or a person acting for him.

“Home solicitation sale” shall not mean a consumer sale or lease of farm equipment. B. 1. “Home solicitation sale” shall not mean a consumer sale or lease of farm equipment.

It does not include cash sales of less than twenty-five dollars, a sale or lease made pursuant to a preexisting revolving charge account, or a sale or lease made pursuant to prior negotiations between the parties.

As used in this chapter, “goods” means tangible personal property and also includes a merchandise certificate whereby a writing is issued by the seller which is not redeemable in cash and is usable in lieu of cash in exchange for goods or services; “seller”
means seller or lessor and “buyer” means buyer or lessee.

History.
1970, c. 668; 1972, c. 448; 1975, c. 217; 1986, c. 577.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

“Home Solicitation Sale.” —

Defendant’s demurrer was sustained because plaintiff did not state sufficient facts to support a violation of the Virginia Home Solicitation Sales Act because she failed to sufficiently allege a home solicitation sale as defendant came to plaintiff’s
residence at her request to conduct home repair services; and her complaint failed to allege that she agreed to purchase services from defendant when its representative first visited her at her home because the contract for specific
services was typed, indicating that it likely was not completed at the time of the initial visit, and the contract was dated almost two months before plaintiff’s dated signature, further proof that she probably did not execute the
agreement during the home visit. Theuer v. Norfolk Air Heating & Cooling, Inc., 106 Va. Cir. 113, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 190 (Norfolk Oct. 7, 2020).

§ 59.1-21.3.
Cancellation of sale.

Except as provided in subsection (5), in addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer
to purchase which complies with § 59.1-21.4.

Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address stated in the agreement or offer to purchase.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given when it is deposited in a mailbox properly addressed and postage prepaid.

Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the home solicitation sale.

The buyer may not cancel a home solicitation sale if the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay because of an emergency, and

The seller in good faith makes a substantial beginning of performance of the contract before the buyer gives notice of cancellation, and

In the case of goods, the goods cannot be returned to the seller in substantially as good condition as when received by the buyer, and

The buyer’s emergency request is in a dated writing personally signed by the buyer and which expressly states that the buyer understands that he is waiving his right to cancel the sale under the provisions of this act.

Except as provided in subsection (5), any waiver or modification of a buyer’s right to cancel is void and of no effect. In the event the seller obtains from the buyer a waiver or modification of his right to cancel, the buyer’s right to cancel shall commence
on the first business day following his learning that the waiver or modification is void and of no effect.

History.
1970, c. 668; 1972, c. 448.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 7.

§ 59.1-21.4.
Receipt or written agreement.

In a home solicitation sale, unless the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in an emergency, the seller must present to the buyer a fully completed receipt if it is a cash or credit card sale or obtain the buyer’s signature
to a written agreement or offer to purchase, in the case of a credit sale, which designates as the date of the transaction the date on which the buyer actually makes payment in whole or in part or signs, and which contains a statement
of the buyer’s rights and a notice of cancellation which comply with subsection (2). The seller shall also furnish the buyer with a copy of any contract pertaining to a home solicitation sale at the time of its execution.

The statement shall

Appear on the front side of the receipt or contract, or immediately above the buyer’s signature, in bold face type of a minimum size of ten points under the conspicuous caption: “BUYER’S RIGHT TO CANCEL,” and

Read as either of the following: (i) “If this agreement was solicited at a residence and you do not want the goods or services, you, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to midnight of the third business day after the date of this
transaction. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.

Except as otherwise provided in this section until the seller has complied with this section the buyer may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller in any manner and by any means of his intention to cancel.

A home solicitation sale shall be deemed to be in compliance with notice requirements of this section if (a) the buyer may at any time (i) cancel the order, or (ii) refuse to accept delivery of the goods without any obligation to pay for them, or (iii)
return the goods to the seller and receive a full refund for any amount the buyer has paid; and (b) the buyer’s right to cancel the order, refuse delivery or return the goods, together with the name and address of either the selling
company or the salesperson, is clearly and conspicuously set forth on the face or reverse side of the sales receipt or contract in a size larger than that used in the body of the receipt or contract.

Any statement or notice form satisfying the requirements of this section as in effect prior to July 1, 1975, may be used until January 1, 1977.

Notice of Cancellation (Date of Transaction) To cancel this transaction, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written notice, or send a telegram to . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., at
(name of seller) (address of seller’s place of business) not later than midnight of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . (Date) I hereby cancel this transaction (Date) ”; or (Buyer’s signature)

History.
1970, c. 668; 1972, c. 448; 1973, c. 147; 1975, c. 217.

§ 59.1-21.5.
Tender of payments to buyer.

Except as provided in this section, within ten days after a home solicitation sale has been canceled or an offer to purchase revoked the seller must tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness.

If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods must be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this section, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal
to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.

Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this section, the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to him by the seller and has a lien on the goods in his possession or control for any recovery to which he is entitled.

History.
1970, c. 668; 1972, c. 448; 1973, c. 147.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.04 Equity. Bryson.

§ 59.1-21.6.
Tender of goods to seller.

Except as provided by the provisions of § 59.1-21.5 (3), within a reasonable time after a home solicitation sale has been canceled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer upon demand must tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant
to the sale but he is not obligated to tender at any place other than his residence. If the seller fails to demand possession of goods within twenty days after cancellation or revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer
without obligation to pay for them.

The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the goods in his possession before cancellation or revocation and for a reasonable time thereafter, during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller’s risk.

If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a home solicitation sale prior to its cancellation, the seller is entitled to no compensation.

History.
1970, c. 668; 1973, c. 147.

§ 59.1-21.7.
Cancellation of contract when seller has misrepresented nature or purpose of transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if at the time of a home solicitation a seller or his agent should fail to immediately identify himself as a seller or lessor, or should he represent or imply that his purpose at the time of solicitation is
anything other than selling or leasing if that is not substantially true, the buyer shall have a total of thirty days to cancel any home solicitation sales contract there entered into in the same manner and to the same extent as otherwise
provided by this chapter; provided that the goods or merchandise are made available for the seller’s repossession and are tendered back to the seller in substantially as good condition as when received by the buyer.

History.
1972, c. 448; 2001, c. 402.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 402 substituted “provision” for “provisions,” and substituted “imply” for “infer.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

§ 59.1-21.7:1.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act of 1977, Chapter
17 (§ 59.1-196 et seq.) of this title.

History.
1987, cc. 462, 464.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Demurrer sustained. —

Homeowners did not allege facts, which if true, supported a claim of violation of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act because the fact that the contractor orally agreed to provide a scope of work and did not do so was not a misrepresentation constituting
actionable fraud in the inducement to enter into the agreement. Jenkins Servs., LLC v. Martin, 95 Va. Cir. 5, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 241 (Westmoreland County Feb. 5, 2016).